North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 6. Elections.

§ 18B-600.
Places eligible to hold alcoholic beverage elections.

Kinds of Elections. — The following kinds of alcoholic beverage elections shall be permitted:

Malt beverage;

Unfortified wine;

ABC store; and

Mixed beverage.

(a1)

ABC Store Elections Requiring Merger. —

A jurisdiction located in a county where an ABC board is already in operation may hold an ABC store election only if all of the following criteria are met:

(1)

The jurisdiction has negotiated the details of the merger required by G.S. 18B-700(c1) if the establishment of ABC stores is approved.

(2)

The details of the planned merger, including the distribution of profits, have been determined in accordance with

G.S. 18B-703

, and have been made available to all registered voters in the jurisdiction where the ABC store election is to be held.

County Elections. — Any county may hold a malt beverage, unfortified wine, or ABC store election. A county may hold a mixed beverage election only if the county already operates at least one county ABC store or a county election on ABC stores is to be held at the same time as the mixed beverage election.

City Malt Beverage and Unfortified Wine Elections. — A city may hold a malt beverage or unfortified wine election only if the county in which the city is located has already held such an election, the vote in the last county election was against the sale of that kind of alcoholic beverage, and one or more of the following apply:

The city has a population of 500 or more according to the most recent federal decennial census.

The city operates an ABC store.

The city has a population of 400 or more but less than 500 according to the most recent federal decennial census and had a population of 500 or more according to the prior federal decennial census.

(c1)

Certain City Malt Beverage and Unfortified Wine Elections. —

A city may hold a malt beverage or unfortified wine election only if all of the following criteria are met:

(1)

The county in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the area of the primary corporate limits of the city is located has already held such an election, and the vote in the last county election was against the sale of that kind of alcoholic beverage.

(2)

The city has a population of 200 or more.

(3)

The county in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the area of the primary corporate limits of the city is located also contains three or more other cities that have previously voted to allow malt beverage or unfortified wine sales.

City ABC Store Elections. — A city may hold an ABC store election only if all of the following criteria are met:

The city has at least 1,000 registered voters.

The county in which the city is located does not operate ABC stores.

At least one other city in the same county operates an ABC store.

City Mixed Beverage Elections. — A city may hold a mixed beverage election if the city has at least 500 registered voters. Provided, that if a city that qualifies for an election under this subsection approves the sale of mixed beverages, mixed beverages permittees in the city may purchase liquor from the ABC store designated by the local ABC board that has been approved by the Commission for this purpose.

(e1)

Small City Mixed Beverage Elections. —

A city may also hold a mixed beverage election if the city has at least 300 registered voters and is located in a county with at least one other city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages. Provided, that if a city that qualifies for an election under this subsection approves the sale of mixed beverages, mixed beverages permittees in the smaller city may purchase liquor from the ABC store designated by any local ABC board in any other city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.This subsection shall not apply to Alamance, Avery, Burke, Caldwell, Carteret, Cleveland, Henderson, Onslow, Polk, Robeson, Rowan, Rutherford, and Wilkes Counties.

(e2)

Ski Resorts ABC Elections. —

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any city that provides governmental services to as many as 1,000 snow skiers weekly during the normal ski season from December 1 through March 15, may hold an election authorized by subdivision (a)(1), (2), or (4) of this section. If the sale of mixed beverages is approved, purchase-transportation permits shall be issued and the sales of liquor shall be made by any local board designated by the State ABC Commission.

(e3)

Small Town Mixed Beverage Elections. —

A town may hold a mixed beverage election if the town (i) has at least 200 registered voters, is located in a county bordering the Neuse River and Pamlico Sound that has not approved the sale of mixed beverages, and that county has only one city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages or (ii) has at least 200 registered voters, has a total area of less than 1 square mile, operates an ABC store, and is located in a county that has at least three cities that have approved the sale of mixed beverages. Provided, that if a town that qualifies for an election under this subsection approves the sale of mixed beverages, mixed beverages permittees in the town may purchase liquor from the ABC store designated by any local ABC board in any other city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.

(e4)

Multicounty/City ABC Elections. —

If a city is located in two or more counties, the following provisions shall apply:

The city may hold a malt beverage or unfortified wine election if any county in which a portion of the city is located has already held such an election, the vote in the last election of the particular type was against the sale of that type of alcoholic beverage, and the city has a population of 500 or more.

The city may hold a mixed beverage election if the city has at least 500 registered voters and a county in which a portion of the city is located operates ABC stores, or a municipality in either county in which the city is located operates an ABC store.

If an election is held by a city under this subsection, all of the city voters may vote in the election. If the vote is for approval, alcoholic beverages may be sold on the basis of that approval and under the provisions of this Chapter. If the sale of mixed beverages is approved, the mixed beverage permittees shall purchase their liquor from one or more ABC stores located within the city that have been designated by the local boards for those purchases. The remaining gross receipts shall be distributed in accordance with existing law applicable to those ABC stores, except that after the applicable distributions have been made pursuant to G.S. 18B-805(b), (c), and (d), the local share of the mixed beverages surcharge and the guest room cabinet surcharge required by G.S. 18B-804(b)(8) and (9) shall be distributed one-half to the general fund of the city where the mixed beverage permittees are located and one-half to the local ABC boards from whose stores liquor is purchased.

(e5)

Small Resort Town ABC Elections. —

A town may hold a mixed beverage election if it:

(1)

Was incorporated after 1990 and prior to the effective date of this subsection;

(2)

Has at least 100 residents;

(3)

Is located in a county that borders another state and that has two other municipalities which have ABC stores; and

At the time of the election, has corporate boundaries that border or include land in three counties.Provided, that if a town that qualifies for an election under this subsection approves the sale of mixed beverages, mixed beverages permittees in the town may purchase liquor from the ABC store designated by any local ABC board in any other city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.

Township Elections. — An election may be called on any of the propositions listed in

G.S. 18B-602

in any township located within:

A county where ABC stores have heretofore been established by petition pursuant to law.

A county where ABC stores have been established pursuant to law, in which county according to data from the North Carolina Department of Commerce: (i) one-third or more of the employment is travel related, (ii) spending on travel exceeds four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) per year, and where the entirety of two townships consists of one island (and several smaller islands not making up more than one percent (1%) of the total land area of the two townships) where that island:

Has a population of 4,000 or over according to the most recent decennial federal census;

Is located with one side facing the ocean and another side facing a coastal sound.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, s. 24, effective August 17, 2004.

An election may be called on any of the propositions listed in

G.S. 18B-602

(a), (d), and (h) in any township located within a county where the population of all cities in the county that have previously approved the sale of any kind of alcoholic beverages comprises more than twenty percent (20%) of the total county population as of the most recent federal census. In the case of subdivision (2) of this section, an election may be called in the two townships voting together on the proposition contained in G.S. 18B-602(h).The election shall be held by the county board of elections upon request of the county board of commissioners or upon petition of twenty-five percent (25%) of the registered voters of the township, or in the case of subdivision (2) of this section, of the two townships taken together. The election shall be conducted and the results determined in the same manner as county elections held under this Article. For purposes of this Article, townships holding any election under this subsection shall be treated on the same basis as counties, and municipalities located within those townships shall be treated on the same basis as cities. In the case of an election under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the votes of the two townships counted together shall determine the result of the election.For purposes of this subsection, the name and boundary of a township is as it is shown on the Redistricting Census 2000 TIGER Files with modifications made by the Legislative Services Office on its computer database as of May 1, 2001.In any township election held under this subsection, the area within any incorporated municipality is excluded, and no permits may be issued under this subsection in any excluded area.In order for an establishment to qualify for a permit under this subsection, the establishment’s gross receipts from food and nonalcoholic beverages shall be greater than its gross receipts from alcoholic beverages.

Beautification District Elections. — In a county where ABC stores have been approved by an election and a beautification district has been created after May, 1984, and prior to June 30, 1990, an election authorized by subsection (a) of this section may be called in the beautification district. The election shall be called in accordance with G.S. 18B-601(b), conducted, and the results determined in the same manner as county elections held under this Article. For purposes of this Article, beautification districts holding any election shall be treated on the same basis as counties, and municipalities located within those beautification districts shall be treated on the same basis as cities.

Railroad Passenger Terminus Location Elections. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any city or town that is the passenger terminus of a rail line that carries at least 60,000 passengers annually may hold an election authorized by subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section. Any election held under this subsection shall be for the on-premises sale of malt beverages and the on-premises sale of unfortified wine pursuant to G.S. 18B-602(a)(2) and G.S. 18B-602(d)(2).

History.

1937, c. 49, ss. 25, 26; c. 431; 1947, c. 1084, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1951, c. 999, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 816; 1963, c. 265, ss. 1-3; 1965, c. 506; 1969, c. 647, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, cc. 32, 33; 1977, c. 149, s. 1; c. 182, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1138, s. 15; 1979, c. 140, ss. 2, 3; c. 609, s. 1; c. 683, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1174; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 49; 1983, c. 113, s. 1; 1983, c. 457, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 919, s. 1; 1987, c. 766; 1989, c. 77; c. 400, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 976, s. 1; 1993, c. 193, s. 1; 1995, c. 148, s. 1; 2001-515, s. 4; 2003-218, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 24; 2005-336, s. 1; 2007-386, s. 1; 2010-122, ss. 7(b), 8; 2015-103, s. 7; 2018-28, s. 1; 2018-65, s. 3; 2019-182, s. 16(a); 2021-150, s. 14.1.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 6) Avery and Watauga: 1985, c. 390; (as to Article 6) town of Beech Mountain: 1983, c. 285; 1985, c. 390; town of Seven Devils: 1985, c. 671, s. 1; town of Seven Springs: 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1142.

§ 18B-601.
Election procedure.

Generally. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, an alcoholic beverage election shall be conducted in the same manner and under the same rules as a referendum under Chapter 163.

How County Election Called. — A county alcoholic beverage election shall be conducted by the county board of elections. When a county is eligible to hold an election under

G.S. 18B-600

, the county board of elections shall hold the election upon receiving either:

A written request for an election from the governing body of the county; or

A petition requesting an election signed by at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the voters registered in the county at the time the petition was initiated.

How City Election Called. — A city alcoholic beverage election shall be conducted by the county board of elections or, in the case of a city authorized under Chapter 163 to conduct its own elections, by the city board of elections. When a city is eligible to hold an election under

G.S. 18B-600

, the board of elections shall hold the election upon receiving either:

A written request for an election from the city governing body; or

A petition requesting an election signed by at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the voters registered in the city at the time the petition was initiated.

Form of Request. — A request or petition for a malt beverage election shall state which of the four propositions in G.S. 18B-602(a) are to be voted upon. A request or petition for an unfortified wine election shall state which of the three propositions in G.S. 18B-602(d) are to be voted upon. More than one kind of alcoholic beverage election may be included in a single request or petition.

Petitions. — A petition for an election shall be on a form provided by the appropriate local board of elections and shall contain the signature, name, address and precinct of each voter who signs. A petition shall be considered initiated at the time the form is delivered by the board of elections to the person who requests it. Within 72 hours after the petition is initiated, the board of elections shall certify the number of registered voters in the city or county at the time it was initiated. The petition shall be returned to the board of elections within 90 days of the time it is initiated. Failure to return the petition within that time shall render it void. The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency of the petition within 30 days after it is returned.

Election Date. — The board of elections shall conduct and set the date for the alcoholic beverage election in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

.

Registration. — No separate registration shall be required to vote in an alcoholic beverage election. Registration shall be closed for an alcoholic beverage election in the same manner and under the same schedule as for any other election.

Notice. — The board of elections shall give notice of an alcoholic beverage election and notice of the close of registration in the same manner and under the same schedule as for any other election.

Observers. — The proponents and opponents for an alcoholic beverage election, as determined by the local board of elections, shall have the right to appoint two observers to attend each voting place. The persons authorized to appoint observers shall, three days before the election, submit in writing to the chief judge of each precinct a signed list of the observers appointed for that precinct. The persons appointed as observers shall be registered voters of the precinct for which appointed. The chief judge and judges for the precinct may for good cause reject any appointee and require that another be appointed. Observers shall do no electioneering at the voting place nor in any manner impede the voting process, interfere or communicate with or observe any voter in casting his ballot. Observers shall be permitted in the voting place to make such observation and to take such notes as they may desire.

History.

1937, c. 49, ss. 25, 26; c. 431; 1947, c. 1084, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1951, c. 999, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 816; 1963, c. 265, ss. 1-3; 1965, c. 506; 1969, c. 647, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, cc. 32, 33; 1977, c. 149, s. 1; c. 182, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1138, s. 15; 1979, c. 140, ss. 2, 3; c. 609, s. 1; c. 683, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1174; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1985, c. 705, ss. 1, 2.1; 1987, c. 14; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 8; 2013-381, s. 10.3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Local Modification.

Town of Chadbourn: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 895, s. 5.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter III of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 163” in subsections (a) and (c); and substituted “163A-1592” for “163-287” in subsection (f).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsections (a), (c), and (f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 10.3, effective January 1, 2014, rewrote subsection (f), which formerly read “Election Date. — The board of elections shall set the date for the alcoholic beverage election, which may not be sooner than 60 days nor later than 120 days from the date the request was received from the governing body or the petition was verified by the board. No alcoholic beverage election may be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November of an even-numbered year.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 18B-602.
Form of ballots.

Malt Beverage Elections. — Any one or more of the propositions listed below may be placed on the ballot for a malt beverage election. Each voter may vote on each proposition on the ballot. The propositions to be used shall be chosen by the governing body or petitioner requesting the election. The propositions shall read as follows:

To permit the “on-premises” and “off-premises” sale of malt beverages.

• FOR

• AGAINST

To permit the “on-premises” sale only of malt beverages.

• FOR

• AGAINST

To permit the “off-premises” sale only of malt beverages.

• FOR

• AGAINST

To permit the “on-premises” sale of malt beverages by Class A hotels, motels, and restaurants only; and to permit “off-premises” sales by other permittees.

• FOR

• AGAINST

Determining Results of Malt Beverage Election. — The kind of malt beverage sales described in each proposition that receives a majority of votes “FOR” shall be allowed. If propositions (2) and (4) are both on the ballot and (2) receives a majority of votes “FOR,” then sales shall be permitted according to that proposition regardless of the vote on (4). If one of the propositions receiving a majority of votes “FOR” is proposition (1), then the kind of sales described in that proposition shall be allowed regardless of the vote on any other proposition at that election.

Subsequent Malt Beverage Elections. — A subsequent election in which a majority votes “AGAINST” malt beverage proposition (1) shall not affect the legality of sales that have previously been approved under proposition (2), (3), or (4). A subsequent election in which a majority votes “AGAINST” malt beverage proposition (2) or (3) shall not affect the legality of sales that have previously been approved under proposition (4).

Unfortified Wine Elections. — Any one or more of the propositions listed below may be placed on the ballot for an unfortified wine election. Each voter may vote on each proposition on the ballot. The propositions to be used shall be chosen by the governing body or petitioner requesting the election. The propositions shall read as follows:

To permit the “on-premises” and “off-premises” sale of unfortified wine.

• FOR

• AGAINST

To permit the “on-premises” sale only of unfortified wine.

• FOR

• AGAINST

To permit the “off-premises” sale only of unfortified wine.

• FOR

• AGAINST

Determining Results of Unfortified Wine Election. — The kind of unfortified wine sales described in each proposition that receives a majority of votes “FOR” shall be allowed. If one of the propositions receiving a majority of votes “FOR” is proposition (1), then the kind of sales described in that proposition shall be allowed, regardless of the vote on any other proposition at that election.

Subsequent Unfortified Wine Election. — A subsequent election in which a majority votes “AGAINST” unfortified wine proposition (1) shall not affect the legality of sales previously approved under proposition (2) or (3).

ABC Store Elections. — The ballot for an ABC store election shall state the proposition as follows:To permit the operation of ABC stores.• FOR• AGAINST

Mixed Beverage Elections. — The ballot for a mixed beverage election shall state the proposition as follows:To permit the sale of mixed beverages in hotels, restaurants, private clubs, community theatres, and convention centers and the “on-premises” and “off-premises” sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine in qualified establishments.• FOR• AGAINST

History.

1947, c. 1084, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1951, c. 999, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 816; 1963, c. 265, ss. 1-3; 1965, c. 506; 1969, c. 647, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 33; 1977, c. 149, s. 1; c. 182, s. 2; 1979, c. 140, s. 3; c. 683, s. 13; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, s. 9; 1983, c. 583, s. 6; 2021-150, s. 13.1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-150, s. 13.1(a), effective December 10, 2021, added “and the ‘on-premises’ and ‘off-premises’ sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine in qualified establishments” at the end of subsection (h).

§ 18B-603.
Effect of alcoholic beverage elections on issuance of permits.

Malt Beverage Elections. — If a malt beverage election is held under G.S. 18B-602(a) and the sale of malt beverages is approved, the Commission may issue permits to qualified persons and establishments in the jurisdiction that held the election as follows:

If on-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue on-premises malt beverage permits.

If off-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue off-premises malt beverage permits.

If both on-premises and off-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue both on-premises and off-premises malt beverage permits.

If the kinds of sales described in G.S. 18B-602(a)(4) are approved, the Commission may issue on-premises malt beverage permits to restaurants and hotels only and off-premises malt beverage permits to other permittees.

Unfortified Wine Elections. — If an unfortified wine election is held under G.S. 18B-602(d) and the sale of unfortified wine is approved, the Commission may issue permits to qualified persons and establishments in the jurisdiction that held the election as follows:

If on-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue on-premises unfortified wine permits.

If off-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue off-premises unfortified wine permits.

If both on-premises and off-premises sales are approved, the Commission may issue both on-premises and off-premises unfortified wine permits.

ABC Store Elections. — If an ABC store election is held under G.S. 18B-602(g) and the establishment of ABC stores is approved, each of the following shall be authorized in the jurisdiction that held the election:

The jurisdiction that held the election may establish and operate ABC stores in the manner described in Articles 7 and 8.

The Commission may issue on-premises and off-premises fortified wine and unfortified wine permits to qualified persons and establishments in that jurisdiction, regardless of any unfortified wine election or any local act, except that neither on-premises nor off-premises unfortified wine permits may be issued in a jurisdiction if:

The jurisdiction approved ABC stores before January 1, 1982;

The jurisdiction held an unfortified wine election before January 1, 1982; and

In that unfortified wine election, the jurisdiction did not approve either on-premises or off-premises sales of unfortified wine.

The Commission may issue brown-bagging permits to restaurants, hotels, and community theatres in the county in which the election was held, whether the election was held by the county or by a city or other jurisdiction within the county. Brown-bagging permits may not be issued, however, for restaurants, hotels, or community theatres in any jurisdiction in which the sale of mixed beverages has been approved.

Mixed Beverage Elections. — If a mixed beverage election is held under G.S. 18B-602(h) and the sale of mixed beverages is approved, the Commission may issue permits to qualified persons and establishments in the jurisdiction that held the election as follows:

The Commission may issue mixed beverage permits.

The Commission may issue on-premises malt beverage, unfortified wine, and fortified wine permits for establishments with mixed beverage permits, regardless of any other election or any local act concerning sales of those kinds of alcoholic beverages.

The Commission may issue off-premises malt beverage permits to any establishment that meets the requirements under

G.S. 18B-1001(2)

in any jurisdiction that has voted to permit the sale of mixed beverages, regardless of any other local act concerning sales of those kinds of alcoholic beverages. The Commission may also issue off-premises unfortified wine permits to any establishment that meets the requirements under

G.S. 18B-1001(4)

in any jurisdiction that has voted to permit the sale of mixed beverages, regardless of any other local act concerning sales of those kinds of alcoholic beverages.

(3a)

The Commission may issue either of the following permits in any jurisdiction that has voted to permit the sale of mixed beverages, regardless of any other local act concerning sales of those kinds of alcoholic beverages:

On-premises malt beverage permits to any establishment that meets the requirements of

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

.

On-premises unfortified wine permits to any establishment that meets the requirements of

G.S. 18B-1001(3)

.

The Commission may issue brown-bagging permits for private clubs and congressionally chartered veterans organizations but may no longer issue and may not renew brown-bagging permits for restaurants, hotels, and community theatres. A restaurant, hotel, or community theatre may not be issued a mixed beverage permit under subdivision (1) until it surrenders its brown-bagging permit.

The Commission may continue to issue culinary permits for establishments that do not have mixed beverage permits. An establishment may not be issued a mixed beverage permit under subdivision (1) until it surrenders its culinary permit.

(d1)

In any county in which the sale of mixed beverages has been approved in elections in at least three cities that, combined, contain more than two-thirds the total county population as of the most recent federal census, the county board of commissioners may by resolution approve the sale of mixed beverages throughout the county, and the Commission may issue permits as if mixed beverages had been approved in a county election.

(d2)

If a county or city holds a mixed beverage election and an ABC store election at the same time and the voters do not approve the establishment of an ABC store, the Commission may issue mixed beverages permits in that county or city. The mixed beverages purchase-transportation permit authorized by G.S. 18B-404(b) shall be issued by a local board operating a store located in the county.

Mixed Beverages at Airports. — When the sale of mixed beverages has been approved in a city election, the Commission may also issue permits under subsection (d) for qualified establishments outside the city but within the same county, if:

The establishment is on the property of an airport;

The airport is operated by the city or by an airport authority in which the city participates; and

The airport services planes which board at least 150,000 passengers annually.

Permits Not Dependent on Elections. — The Commission may issue the following kinds of permits without approval at an election:

Special occasion permits.

Limited special occasion permits.

Brown-bagging permits for private clubs and congressionally chartered veterans organizations.

Culinary permits, except as restricted by subdivision (d)(5).

Special one-time permits issued under

G.S. 18B-1002

.

All permits listed in

G.S. 18B-1100

.

The permits authorized by

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), and (10) for tourism ABC establishments.

The permits authorized by

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), and (10) for tourism resorts.

The permits authorized by G.S. 18B-1001(1), (3), (5), and (10) for historic ABC establishments.

Special auction permits issued under

G.S. 18B-1002

.1.

(f1)

Reserved for future codification purposes.

(f2)

(See note)
Permits for Special ABC Areas. —

The Commission may issue the permits provided for in G.S. 18B-1001(1),

G.S. 18B-1001(2)

,

G.S. 18B-1001(3)

,

G.S. 18B-1001(4)

,

G.S. 18B-1001(5)

,

G.S. 18B-1001(6)

, and

G.S. 18B-1001(10)

to qualified persons and establishments located within a Special ABC area as defined in

G.S. 18B-101

, provided that: (i) if such area is a municipal corporation, the area shall conduct an election authorized by subdivision (a)(4) of

G.S. 18B-600

, which election may be held regardless of the number of registered voters located within the municipal corporation; or (ii) if such area is unincorporated but has within such area a private association or club, the board of such private association or club shall call and conduct a special meeting at which meeting a majority of private association members, club members, lot and home owners, votes and approves the sale of mixed beverages, and the board certifies the results of such meeting to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission. The mixed beverages purchase-transportation permit authorized by G.S. 18B-404(b) shall be issued by a local board operating a store located in the same county as the Special ABC area.

Miscellaneous. — The definitions in

G.S. 18B-1000

shall apply to this section.

Permits Based on Existing Permits. — In any county which borders on the Atlantic Ocean and where (i) the sale of malt beverage on and off premises, the sale of unfortified wine on and off premises, the sale of mixed beverages, and the operation of an ABC system has been allowed in at least six cities in the county, or in any county adjacent to that county in which an ABC system has been allowed, or (ii) the sale of malt beverage on and off premises, the sale of unfortified wine on and off premises, the sale of mixed beverages, and the operation of an ABC system has been allowed in at least eight cities in the county, the Commission may issue permits to sports clubs as defined in G.S. 18B-1000(8) throughout the county.The Commission may issue the following permits:

On and Off Premises Malt Beverage;

On and Off Premises Unfortified Wine;

On and Off Premises Fortified Wine; or

Mixed Beverages.

The Commission may also issue on-premises malt beverage, unfortified wine, fortified wine and mixed beverages permits to a sports club located in a county adjacent to any county that has approved the sale of mixed beverages pursuant to G.S. 18B-603(d1), if the county in which the sports club is located borders another state and has at least one city that has approved the sale of mixed beverages. Sports clubs holding mixed beverages permits shall purchase their spirituous liquor at the nearest ABC system store that is located in the county.

The Commission may further issue on-premises malt beverage and on-premises unfortified wine permits to a sports club located in a county bordering on another state that is adjacent to any county in which permits were issued pursuant to this subsection prior to August 1, 1993. The sports clubs must be located in the unincorporated areas of a county, in which the sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine is not permitted, and where there are six or more municipalities in that county where the sale of malt beverages and unfortified wine is permitted.

History.

1947, c. 1084, s. 3; 1969, c. 647, s. 2; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 589; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1240; 1983, c. 113, s. 2; 1985, c. 689, s. 7; 1987, c. 136, ss. 5, 6; c. 307, s. 2; c. 443, s. 2; 1989, c. 629, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 920, ss. 11, 13; 1993, c. 415, ss. 7-9; 1995, c. 466, s. 5; 1999-456, s. 10; 1999-461, s. 2; 1999-462, ss. 3, 6, 7, 9.; 2000-140, s. 2; 2004-199, s. 9; 2007-402, s. 1; 2017-87, s. 3(a); 2021-150, s. 13.1(b).

Local Modification.

City of Kannapolis:
2004-92, s. 9 (as to ABC election); Village of Bald Head Island: 1985, c. 156.

§ 18B-604.
Timing and effect of subsequent elections.

Time Limits. — No county alcoholic beverage election may be held within three years of the certification of the results of a previous election on the same kind of alcoholic beverages in that county. No city alcoholic beverage election may be held within three years of the certification of the results of a previous election on the same kind of alcoholic beverage in that city. Otherwise, alcoholic beverage elections may be held at any time, subject to the applicable provisions of this Chapter and Chapter 163.

Effect of Favorable County Vote on City or Township. — If a majority of voters vote in favor of certain alcoholic beverage sales in a county election, sale of that kind of alcoholic beverage shall be lawful throughout the county, regardless of the vote in any city or township at that or any previous or subsequent election, and regardless of any local act making sales unlawful in that city or township, unless the local act was ratified before the effective date of Article II, Section 24(1)(j) of the Constitution of North Carolina. A county malt beverage or unfortified [wine] election in favor of a particular ballot proposition which is more restrictive than the form of sale already allowed in a city or township within that county shall not affect the legality of those previously authorized sales in the city or township.

Effect of Negative County Vote on City or Township. — If a majority of voters vote against certain alcoholic beverage sales in a county election, sale of that kind of alcoholic beverage shall be unlawful throughout the county, except that sale of that alcoholic beverage shall remain lawful in any city or township in which sale is lawful because of a city or township election or a local act.

Effect of City or Township Election on County. — A city or township alcoholic beverage election shall not affect the lawfulness of sale in any part of the county outside that city or township.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-218, s. 2, effective June 19, 2003.

When Sales Stop. — When the sale of any alcoholic beverage that was previously lawful becomes unlawful because of an election, the sale of that alcoholic beverage shall cease 90 days after certification of the results of the election.

History.

1937, c. 49, ss. 25, 26; c. 431; 1947, c. 1084, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1951, c. 999, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 816; 1963, c. 265, ss. 1-3; 1965, c. 506; 1969, c. 647, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, cc. 32, 33; 1977, c. 149, s. 1; c. 182, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1138, s. 15; 1979, c. 140, ss. 2, 3; c. 609, s. 1; c. 683, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1174; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1993, c. 415, s. 29; 2003-218, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled `Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter III of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 163” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (a).

§ 18B-605.
Local act elections.

If a jurisdiction has lawfully voted in favor of ABC stores or in favor of the sale of some kind of alcoholic beverage, and the jurisdiction would not be eligible to hold another election under the conditions set by

G.S. 18B-600

, then that jurisdiction may continue to hold elections as though qualified under

G.S. 18B-600

. Except for the authority to hold the election, however, the procedures of this Chapter shall apply to any subsequent election.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1983, c. 457, s. 4.

§§ 18B-606 through 18B-699.

Reserved for future codification purposes.